src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON oesATTR     ! var oesATTR_oen_an_ADVERB                                                    !==> UT!
!! # UMLAUT LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Theese 5 adjectives is in the 4. group of the southsámi adjectives, The group which contains all
!! umlaut-adjectives. Theese adjectives which have -oes  as attributeform and -an as predicativeform, is north-southsámi adjectives, and they dont have any comparation.
!! This group which covers the ies -> an/ as-> an and oes-> an + umlaut change, is a small undergruppe of the 4.group
!! ```
  +A:oe     ATTR_S   ; !!= @CODE@
!   :%^3UML PRED_AN  ; !!= @CODE@
!  +Use/NG:an     adv      ;
!    :oen    adv      ;
  +A:       N_OE_OBL ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```


LEXICON oehATTR   !  !var oehATTR_oen_ADVERB
!! ```
  +A:oe  ATTR_H     ; !!= @CODE@
! :oe  PRED_N     ; !!= @CODE@
!   :oen adv                                           !
  +A:ohk ODDCASEOBL ;
!! ```

LEXICON oehATTR2 ! an- is adverb    !var oehATTR_anADVERB
!! ```
         +A:oe        ATTR_H    ; !!= @CODE@
! +Use/NG:%^3UMLa   PRED_N    ; !!= @CODE@

!   +Use/NG:an        adv      ;
  +Use/NG+A:ahk       ODDCOMP   ;
!          :oen       adv       ;
  +Use/NG+A:oehk      ODD_ÅBPOE ;
!        :%^3UMLahk ODD_ÅBPOE ; !!= @CODE@
         +A:ohk       ODDCASE   ;
!! ```

LEXICON ahATTR_anADVERB !
  +A:a   ATTR_H     ;

  :an  adv        ;
  +A:ahk ODDCOMP    ;
  +A:ehk ODDCASEOBL ;


LEXICON oeh_ahATTR_anADVERB !
  +A+Use/NG:a   ATTR_H     ;
  +A:oeh ATTR_H     ;
  :an  adv        ;
  +A:ahk ODDCOMP    ;
  +A:ehk ODDCASEOBL ;


! ************************************
!  SLUTT "KLASSE 4" = ATTR/ADVERB
!*************************************


! ***************************************************************************************
!  **** ODD-stavelses-adjektiv   ****   !
! ODD-stems (odd stem declension)
! ***************************************************************************************



LEXICON Ce_CE_ODD  !bårreske
 :%^DISIMPe ATTR_0     ;
 :%^DISIMPe PRED_0     ;
            ODDCASEOBL ;
            ODDCOMP    ;

LEXICON Ce_CE_ODDNOCOMP
             :%^DISIMPe ATTR_0     ;
             :%^DISIMPe PRED_0     ;
                        ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ;


LEXICON Ch_CE_ODDNOCOMP
             :h   ATTR_0      ;
             :ege PRED_0      ;
                  ODDCASE_EGE ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:h   R           ;

LEXICON ODDCASE_EGE
          +Sg+Acc:egem      FINAL1 ;
          +Sg+Gen:egen      FINAL1 ;
          +Sg+Ill:easse     FINAL1 ;
          +Sg+Ine:egisnie   FINAL1 ;
          +Sg+Ela:egistie   FINAL1 ;
          +Sg+Com:eginie    FINAL1 ;
          +Pl+Nom:egh       FINAL1 ;
          +Pl+Acc:egidie    FINAL1 ;
          +Pl+Gen:egi       FINAL1 ;
          +Pl+Ill:egidie    FINAL1 ;
          +Pl+Ine:eginie    FINAL1 ;
          +Pl+Ela:egijstie  FINAL1 ;
          +Pl+Com:egigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:egigyjmie FINAL1 ;
       +Cmp/SgGen:egen      R      ;
       +Cmp/PlGen:egi       R      ;




LEXICON oeCe_OECE_ODD  !bårreske
 :%^DISIMPe ATTR_0     ;
 :%^DISIMPe PRED_0     ;
            ODDCASEOBL ;
            ODD_ÅBPOE  ;

! Gå igjnenom disse hth-hts-adjektivene
LEXICON hth_HTH_ODD   ! NB!
             :%^DISIMP  ATTR_H     ;
             :%^DISIMP  PRED_H     ;
                        ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPh R          ;
                        ODDCOMP    ;

LEXICON oehth_OEHTH_ODD   !NB!
             :%^DISIMP  ATTR_H     ;
             :%^DISIMP  PRED_H     ;
                        ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPh R          ;
                        ODD_ÅBPOE  ;

LEXICON hth_HTH_ODDNOCOMP   ! NB!
             :%^DISIMP  ATTR_H     ;
             :%^DISIMP  PRED_H     ;
                        ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPh R          ;



LEXICON hts_HTH_ODD        ! NB!
    hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;
 : ODDCOMP           ; ! fjernet  -s

LEXICON oehts_OEHTS_ODD     ! NB!
    hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;
 :s ODD_ÅBPOE         ;

LEXICON hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP     ! NB!
! This lexicon is in reality hts_HTS_HTE
! We have info on pred -e for two adjs:
! heijjehts (corpus) and bieljehts (marit) - LA: fjerner -e, jeg kan ikke se at vi har slik dokumentasjon
              :%^DISIMP  ATTR_S     ;
              :%^DISIMP  PRED_S     ;
!             :%^DISIMPe PRED_0     ;
!                        ODDCASEOBL ; !LA tok vekk -s
  +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPs R          ;

LEXICON hts_HTS_ODDhtCOMP     !NB!
  hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;
  ODDCOMP           ; ! joekehtåbpoe
  ODDCASEOBL        ;

LEXICON oehts_OEHTS_ODDhtCOMP    ! NB!
  hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;
  ODD_ÅBPOE         ; ! joekehtåbpoe
  ODDCASEOBL        ;


! ************************
! SE på denne gruppen over
! ************************

LEXICON Ces_CES_ODD
   Ces_CES_ODDNOCOMP ;
   ODDCASEOBL        ;
   ODDCOMP           ;

LEXICON Ces_CES_ODDNOCOMP
            :%^DISIMPe ATTR_S     ;
            :%^DISIMPe PRED_S     ;
                       ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ;

LEXICON les_LES_ODD
 :%^DISIMPe ATTR_S     ;
 :%^DISIMPe PRED_S     ;
            ODDCASEOBL ;
            ODDCOMP    ;

LEXICON oeles_OELES_ODD
 :%^DISIMPe ATTR_S     ;
 :%^DISIMPe PRED_S     ;
            ODDCASEOBL ;
            ODD_ÅBPOE  ;

!LEXICON Cs_CS_CE_ODD
!   Cs_CS_CE_ODDNOCOMP ;
!   ODDCOMP            ;

LEXICON oeCs_OECS_OECE_ODD
   Cs_CS_CE_ODDNOCOMP ;
   ODD_ÅBPOE          ;

LEXICON Cs_CS_CE_ODDNOCOMP
    +Err/Orth:%^DISIMPe ATTR_S     ;
            :%^DISIMP  ATTR_S     ;
     +Use/NG:%^DISIMP  PRED_S     ;
            :%^DISIMPe PRED_0     ;
                       ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ;


LEXICON Cs_CS_ODD
            :%^DISIMP  ATTR_S     ;
            :%^DISIMP  PRED_S     ;
                       ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ;
                       ODDCOMP    ;

LEXICON oeCs_OECS_ODD
            :%^DISIMP  ATTR_S     ;
            :%^DISIMP  PRED_S     ;
                       ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ;
                       ODD_ÅBPOE  ;

LEXICON Cs_CS_ODDNOCOMP
            :%^DISIMP  ATTR_S     ;
            :%^DISIMP  PRED_S     ;
                       ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ;



LEXICON MAST
!! ## LEXICON `@LEXNAME@`
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for adjectives on `–masten` and `masth` with an
!! used with the stem *masten*
!! ```
                ATTR_S      ; !!= @CODE@
      +Use/NG:e ATTR_S      ; !!= @CODE@
      +Use/NG:  ATTR_H      ; !!= @CODE@
      +Use/NG:e ATTR_N      ; !!= @CODE@
             :e PRED_N      ; !!= @CODE@
 +Sg+Use/NG:  NIEJTESGOBL ;
!        +Sg:  NIEJTESGOBL ;
        +Pl:  NIEJTE_PL   ;
             NIEJTEREST  ;
!! ```

!  **** LOAN     *****  !

LEXICON IJVEadj
!! # IJVE_LOAN_ADJ LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! EVEN adjective EVEN Comparation.
!! Used for all loan-adjectives "ijve".
!! ```
          :ijv e_E_EVEN ; !!= @CODE@
   +Use/NG:ïjv e_E_EVEN ; !!= @CODE@
 +Err/Orth:iv  e_E_EVEN ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```

LEXICON IJAALE_A_LOAN
    +Err/Orth:aal  AALEFORMS ;
    +Err/Orth:al   AALEFORMS ;
    +Err/Orth:jal  AALEFORMS ;
            :jaal AALEFORMS ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:al   R         ;

LEXICON AALE
            :al AALEFORMS ; ! vitaale = norm
    +Err/Orth:l  AALEFORMS ; ! vitale = descriptive
   +Cmp/SgNom:l  R         ;

LEXICON AALEFORMS
! merging spinaale e_E_EVEN  and spinaales es_ES_EVEN
! they were set up as doublets in the lexicon and had
! identical comparatives and superlatives.
! The new solution analyses the same wordforms as before,
! but operates with a single lemma spinaale etc.
! Todo: look into NIEJTE / ODDCASE -variation (double case paradigm?)
             :e ATTR_0      ; ! vitaale
      +Use/NG:e ATTR_S      ;
        +Sg:  NIEJTESGOBL ;
        +Pl:  NIEJTE_PL   ;
             NIEJTEREST  ;
             :e PRED_S      ;
             :e EVENCOMP    ;
